apertium_ben_in_canonical_forms.dix
<pardef n="lO/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>voM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sarasoM/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mAz/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yeM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Gar/a__n">
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Karc/a__n">
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kroXa/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ladak/A__n">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rAjA/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bira/__n">
<e><p><l>re</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="parsarg:re"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Suggested by Chaitanya Sir -->
<!--<pardef n="vAl/A__n">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAz</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyoM</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
-->

<pardef n="loh/A__n">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="viXAwA/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kavi/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yoM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Axam/I__n">
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyoM</l><r>I<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pAnI/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Sawru/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="katu/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Al/U__n">
<e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uoM</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lahU/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ku/Az__n">
<e><p><l>Az</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bira"><i>bira</i><par n="bira/__n"/></e>
<e lm="adabafga"><i>adabafg</i><par n="Karc/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="alakawarA"><i>alakawarA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="ammAz"><i>ammAz</i><par n="mAz/__n"/></e>
<e lm="anehA"><i>anehA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="apakarwA"><i>apakarwA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="araviMxabanXu"><i>araviMxabanXu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="arikeSI"><i>arikeSI</i><par n="pAnI/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aXErya"><i>aXErya</i><par n="kroXa/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aXirohI"><i>aXiroh</i><par n="Axam/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="aXvara"><i>aXvar</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="bahanapA"><i>bahanap</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="balipaSu"><i>balipaSu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bikAU"><i>bikAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="boJA"><i>boJ</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="BokwA"><i>Bokw</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="brahmA"><i>brahmA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BUpawi"><i>BUpawi</i><par n="kavi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="canxrabiMxu"><i>canxrabiMxu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="cattU"><i>catt</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="cAyapAnI"><i>cAyapAnI</i><par n="pAnI/__n"/></e>
<e lm="CiCalA"><i>CiCal</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="DalavAz"><i>DalavAz</i><par n="mAz/__n"/></e>
<e lm="DaluAz"><i>DaluAz</i><par n="mAz/__n"/></e>
<e lm="giranA"><i>giran</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="gO"><i>gO</i><par n="lO/__n"/></e>
<e lm="gopAlaka"><i>gopAlak</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="hamajolI"><i>hamajol</i><par n="Axam/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="hawajIviwa"><i>hawajIviwa</i><par n="kroXa/__n"/></e>
<e lm="janwu"><i>janwu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="joSIlA"><i>joSIl</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="kAjU"><i>kAj</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="karaPyU"><i>karaPyU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="Karca"><i>Karc</i><par n="Karc/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="karja"><i>karj</i><par n="Karc/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="KAz"><i>K</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
<e lm="kiRkiMXyA"><i>kiRkiMXyA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kqwiwva"><i>kqwiwv</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="kuAz"><i>ku</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
<e lm="lO"><i>lO</i><par n="lO/__n"/></e>
<e lm="luwPa"><i>luwPa</i><par n="kroXa/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mArkA"><i>mArkA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="maXu"><i>maXu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAz"><i>mAz</i><par n="mAz/__n"/></e>
<e lm="namUnA"><i>namUn</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="nanxIpawi"><i>nanxIpawi</i><par n="kavi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="navarawna"><i>navarawn</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="nIMbU"><i>nIMb</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="pAFcoM"><i>pAFcoM</i><par n="sarasoM/__n"/></e>
<e lm="panKA"><i>panK</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="paracUnI"><i>paracUn</i><par n="Axam/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="paraxeSa"><i>paraxeSa</i><par n="kroXa/__n"/></e>
<e lm="PavvArA"><i>PavvAr</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="paxmaSrI"><i>paxmaSrI</i><par n="pAnI/__n"/></e>
<e lm="PlU"><i>PlU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="puNyakarwA"><i>puNyakarwA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="royAz"><i>roy</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
<e lm="Sakuni"><i>Sakuni</i><par n="kavi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="saM"><i>saM</i><par n="sarasoM/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sAM"><i>sAM</i><par n="sarasoM/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sarasoM"><i>sarasoM</i><par n="sarasoM/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sAsu"><i>sAsu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sawwU"><i>saww</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="sonA"><i>son</i><par n="loh/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="spaRtIkaraNa"><i>spaRtIkaraN</i><par n="Gar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="SqfganAxa"><i>SqfganAxa</i><par n="kroXa/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sucAru"><i>sucAru</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SUxrAvexI"><i>SUxrAvex</i><par n="Axam/I__n"/></e>
<e lm="udIsA"><i>udIsA</i><par n="viXAwA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="upakulapawi"><i>upakulapawi</i><par n="kavi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="uTAU"><i>uTAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vijFApanaxAwA"><i>vijFApanaxAwA</i><par n="rAjA/__n"/></e>
<e lm="wArA"><i>wAr</i><par n="ladak/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="werahIM"><i>werahIM</i><par n="sarasoM/__n"/></e>
<e lm="wuRAramUrwi"><i>wuRAramUrwi</i><par n="kavi/__n"/></e>
<e lm="xakRiNI"><i>xakRiNI</i><par n="pAnI/__n"/></e>
<e lm="xAru"><i>xAru</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="yUz"><i>yUz</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
